Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1809
Inquest; verdict; form.

The jurors, having inspected the body, heard the testimony, and made all needful inquiries, shall return to the coroner their inquisition in writing, under their hands, in substance as follows, and stating the matter in the following form, as nearly as practicable:

State of Nebraska, ........... County. At an inquisition held at ............, in ............ County, on the .... day of ............ A.D. 20...., before me, ............, coroner of such county, upon the body of ........, lying dead, by the jurors whose names are hereto subscribed, the jurors upon their oath do say ......... (Here state when, how, or by what person, means, weapon, or accident the person came to his or her death, and whether feloniously). In testimony whereof the jurors have hereunto set their hands the day and year aforesaid. Attest: ..............., Coroner.

Laws 1879, § 105, p. 382;

R.S.1913, § 5671;

C.S.1922, § 5001;

C.S.1929, § 26-1510;

R.S.1943, § 23-1809;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 74;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 9.